Maryland, session 2026, HB1025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
5–305.
(a) To qualify for a limited license to practice cosmetology, an applicant shall be
an individual who meets the requirements of this section.
(b) An applicant for a limited license to provide esthetic services shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have completed successfully a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
(3) have received training by:
(i) serving as a registered apprentice for at least 6 months as
provided under §§ 5–404 and 5–405 of this title; or
(ii) successfully completing at least 600 hours of instruction in
providing esthetic services in a cosmetology school approved by the State Department of
Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation with the Board;
and
(4) have completed 1 hour of in–person or virtual training in domestic
violence awareness under § 5–305.1 of this subtitle.
– 1 –

Ch. 299 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) An applicant for a limited license to provide eyelash extension services shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have completed successfully a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
and
(3) [(i)] have received training by:
[1.] (I) serving as a registered apprentice for at least 3
months as provided under §§ 5–404 and 5–405 of this title; or
[2.] (II) successfully completing at least 100 hours of
instruction in providing eyelash extension services in a cosmetology school approved by the
State Department of Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in
consultation with the Board[; or
(ii) pass a practical and written examination administered by the
Board].
(d) An applicant for a limited license to provide hair services shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have completed successfully a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
(3) have received training by:
(i) serving as a registered apprentice for at least 15 months as
provided under §§ 5–404 and 5–405 of this title; or
(ii) successfully completing at least 1,200 hours of instruction
providing hair services in a cosmetology school approved by the State Department of
Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation with the Board;
and
(4) have completed 1 hour of in–person or virtual training in domestic
violence awareness.
(e) An applicant for a limited license to provide hair services – blow drying shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have completed successfully a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 299
(3) have received training by successfully completing at least 350 hours of
instruction providing hair services – blow drying in a cosmetology school approved by the
State Department of Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in
consultation with the Board; and
(4) have completed 1 hour of in–person or virtual training in domestic
violence awareness.
(f) An applicant for a limited license to provide nail technician services shall:
(1) be at least 17 years old;
(2) have successfully completed a 9th grade education or the equivalent;
(3) have received training by:
(i) serving as a registered apprentice for at least 3 months as
provided under §§ 5–404 and 5–405 of this title; or
(ii) successfully completing at least 250 hours of instruction in
providing nail technician services in a cosmetology school approved by the State
Department of Education or the Maryland Higher Education Commission in consultation
with the Board; and
(4) have completed 1 hour of in–person or virtual training in domestic
violence awareness under § 5–305.1 of this subtitle.
(g) If an applicant is licensed to practice as an esthetician, eyelash extension
technician, hairstylist, hairstylist – blow drying technician, or nail technician in another
state or foreign country, the applicant meets the training requirements of this section if the
applicant has held a limited license in the other state or foreign country and has actively
practiced in the other state or foreign country for a period of 6 months.
(h) An applicant for a limited license shall pass an examination given by the
Board under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –